Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-146.04
Adopted person; request for information; form.

An adopted person twenty-one years of age or older born in this state who desires access to the names of relatives or access to his or her original certificate of birth shall file a written request for such information with the department. The department shall provide a form for making such request.

Laws 1988, LB 372, § 9;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 45;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 93.